West Virginia, session 2025, SB230.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: article 6. crimes against the peace. §61-6-26. Collection of DNA for felony convicts. (a) Definitions:(1) "DNA" means deoxyribonucleic acid.(2) "CODIS" means the Combined DNA Index System.(b) Any individual convicted of and sentenced for a felony crime shall provide authorities with a DNA sample.(c) The DNA collected from each person convicted of a felony shall be run against evidence of other open cases and entered into CODIS.(d) Any person who refuses to provide a DNA sample shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than $100.(e) This section shall be enforced by all law enforcement officers within their respective jurisdictions.